Utah statutes.
35A-8-430.   Provisions controlling -- Acts of governmental bodies deemed administrative.

(1)  The provisions of this part are controlling, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in any other law of this state, city charter, or local ordinance. 

(2)  An action of a city, county, or governing body in carrying out the purposes of this part, whether by resolution, ordinance, or otherwise, is considered administrative in character, and no public notice or publication is required with respect to that action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

